District of Columbia statutes.
47-2887.10

Notice to educational institution.

(a)

Within 72 hours after entering into an agency contract or before the next scheduled athletic event in which the student-athlete may participate, whichever occurs first, the athlete agent shall give notice in a record of the existence of the contract to the athletic director of the educational institution at which the student-athlete is enrolled or the athlete agent has reasonable grounds to believe the student-athlete intends to enroll.

(b)

Within 72 hours after entering into an agency contract or before the next athletic event in which the student-athlete may participate, whichever occurs first, the student-athlete shall inform the athletic director of the educational institution at which the student-athlete is enrolled that he or she has entered into an agency contract.

Apr. 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-107, § 3, 49 DCR 1193)
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 11 of the Uniform Athlete Agents Act.